Utah statutes.
58-37e-3.   Liability for participation in the illegal drug market.

(1)  A person who knowingly participates in the illegal drug market within this state is liable for civil damages as provided in this chapter.  A person may recover damages under this chapter for injury resulting from an individual's use of an illegal drug.

(2)  A law enforcement officer or agency, the state, or a person acting at the direction of a law enforcement officer or agency or the state is not liable for participating in the illegal drug market, if the participation is in furtherance of an official investigation.

